New York, session 2025-2026, A9696.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 210-B of the tax law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 63 to read as follows: 3 63. USDA construction tax credit. Notwithstanding any provision in law 4 to the contrary, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against such tax 5 of up to fifteen percent of the difference between the total cost to 6 build and the final sale price of any newly constructed property that a 7 taxpayer sells to a person or persons who finance the purchase of the 8 property with a USDA mortgage. For the purposes of this subdivision, a 9 USDA mortgage shall be any mortgage loan subject to the provisions of 10 Title 7 CFR Part 3550, Title 7 CFR Part 3555, or Title 7 CFR Part 3560. 11 § 2. Section 606 of the tax law is amended by adding a new subsection 12 (bbb) to read as follows: 13 (bbb) USDA construction tax credit. Notwithstanding any provision in 14 law to the contrary, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against such 15 tax of up to fifteen percent of the difference between the total cost to 16 build and the final sale price of any newly constructed property that a 17 taxpayer sells to a person or persons who finance the purchase of the 18 property with a USDA mortgage. For the purposes of this subsection, a 19 USDA mortgage shall be any mortgage loan subject to the provisions of 20 Title 7 CFR Part 3550, Title 7 CFR Part 3555, or Title 7 CFR Part 3560. 21 § 3. The commissioner of taxation and finance shall promulgate rules 22 and regulations necessary to implement this act. 23 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01073-03-6